Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 PUBLIC NOTICE REQUIREMENTS 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 9.9 Public notice administration 3 fund. 4 1. A public notice administration fund is created in the 5 state treasury under the control of the secretary of state. 6 The fund is composed of moneys collected by the secretary 7 pursuant to section 9J.2. 8 2. Moneys in the public notice administration fund are 9 appropriated to the office of the secretary of state for the 10 purpose of supporting the administration of chapter 9J. 11 3. Moneys in the public notice administration fund are 12 not subject to section 8.33. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 13 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the public 14 notice administration fund shall be credited to the fund. 15 4. Moneys in the public notice administration fund shall not 16 exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars. 17 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 9J.1 Definitions. 18 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context 19 otherwise requires: 20 1. âOfficial internet siteâ means the internet site used 21 by a public posting entity to conduct or communicate official 22 business and information. 23 2. âOfficial social media accountâ means a social media 24 account used by a public posting entity to conduct or 25 communicate official business and information. 26 3. âOnline portalâ means the system established and 27 maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter 28 for public posting entities to post statutorily required public 29 notices. 30 4. âPublic posting entityâ means the state of Iowa, a 31 county, a city, a public school district, a private agency as 32 defined in section 28E.2, or a public agency as defined in 33 section 28E.2. 34 5. âStatutorily required public noticeâ means a notice 35 -1- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 1/ 58 S.F. _____ required by the Iowa Code to be made available to members of 1 the public. 2 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 9J.2 Online portal ââ statutorily 3 required public notices. 4 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law other than section 5 9J.3 to the contrary, a public posting entity shall exclusively 6 post any statutorily required public notice as provided in this 7 chapter. 8 2. The secretary of state or the secretary of stateâs 9 designee shall establish and maintain an online portal through 10 which public posting entities shall post statutorily required 11 public notices. 12 3. The online portal shall be searchable by all of the 13 following categories: 14 a. County. 15 b. City. 16 c. School district. 17 d. Public notice type, including but not limited to meeting 18 notices, meeting minutes, elections, abandoned property, 19 proposed rulemaking, and proposed public project. 20 4. The secretary of state shall collect a fee of five 21 dollars from a public posting entity for each notice posted by 22 the public posting entity. 23 5. Moneys collected by the secretary of state pursuant 24 to this section shall be deposited in the public notice 25 administration fund created pursuant to section 9.9 up to the 26 amount specified in section 9.9, subsection 4. If the balance 27 in the public notice administration fund exceeds the amount 28 specified in section 9.9, subsection 4, moneys collected by the 29 secretary of state pursuant to this section shall be deposited 30 in the general fund of the state. 31 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 9J.3 Public posting entities ââ 32 responsibilities. 33 1. Each statutorily required public notice posted pursuant 34 to this chapter shall be posted on a timely basis as required 35 -2- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 2/ 58 S.F. _____ by the law requiring the public notice and include all of the 1 following: 2 a. All information necessary to satisfy the statutory 3 requirements of the specific public posting, including but not 4 limited to the purpose, date, location, and time of a public 5 meeting. 6 b. Current contact information of the public posting entity, 7 including a telephone number and email address, such that the 8 public may contact the public posting entity regarding the 9 public posting. 10 c. Instructions for submitting public comments, if 11 applicable. 12 2. A public posting entity is solely responsible for the 13 contents of its statutorily required public notice. Neither 14 the secretary of state nor the secretary of stateâs designee 15 is responsible for the content of a public posting entityâs 16 statutorily required public notice. This includes but is not 17 limited to monitoring or verifying the accuracy of a public 18 posting entityâs public notice. 19 3. A public posting entity shall maintain a statutorily 20 required public notice on the online portal for a period of 21 five years following the expiration of the statutorily required 22 time the posting was required to be available to the public. 23 Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a posting 24 entityâs requirements to keep a record of such statutorily 25 required public postings if another section requires such 26 records be kept. 27 4. Notwithstanding section 9J.2, a public posting entity 28 shall post a physical copy of a statutorily required public 29 notice on a bulletin board or other prominent place which is 30 easily accessible to the public and clearly designated for that 31 purpose at the principal office of the public posting entity, 32 or if no such office exists, at the building in which the 33 meeting is to be held. 34 5. Nothing in this chapter shall affect the duty of a 35 -3- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 3/ 58 S.F. _____ public posting entity to make public use copies of statutorily 1 required public notices available to the public as otherwise 2 required by law. 3 6. Notwithstanding section 9J.2, subsection 1, a public 4 posting entity may publish a statutorily required public notice 5 on the online portal or as required by the 2026 Iowa Code for a 6 period of six months following the effective date of this Act. 7 This subsection is repealed effective July 1, 2027. 8 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 9J.4 Exceptions. 9 This chapter does not apply to any of the following: 10 1. The office of the governor. 11 2. The general assembly. 12 3. A notice regarding any of the following: 13 a. A rulemaking document posted pursuant to section 2B.5A. 14 b. The interstate physical therapy licensure compact posted 15 pursuant to section 147C.1. 16 c. The emergency medical services personnel licensure 17 interstate compact posted pursuant to section 147D.1. 18 d. The occupational therapy licensure compact posted 19 pursuant to section 147E.1. 20 e. The audiology and speech language pathology interstate 21 compact posted pursuant to section 147F.1. 22 f. The dentist and dental hygienist posted pursuant to 23 section 147G.1. 24 g. The professional counselors licensure compact posted 25 pursuant to section 147H.1. 26 h. The social work licensure compact posted pursuant to 27 section 147I.1. 28 i. The physician assistant licensure compact posted pursuant 29 to section 147J.1. 30 j. The dietitian licensure compact posted pursuant to 31 section 147K.1. 32 k. The respiratory care interstate compact posted pursuant 33 to section 147L.1. 34 l. Any other interstate licensure compact enacted before, 35 -4- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 4/ 58 S.F. _____ on, or after the effective date of this Act. 1 m. The nurse and advanced practice registered nurse 2 licensure compacts posted pursuant to section 152E.1. 3 n. The interstate compact for juveniles posted pursuant to 4 section 232.173. 5 o. The vehicle equipment compacts posted pursuant to section 6 321D.1. 7 4. Notice required to be posted pursuant to chapter 17A. 8 5. Notice required to be posted pursuant to the Constitution 9 of the State of Iowa. 10 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 9J.5 Disputes ââ resolution. 11 A dispute regarding the publication of a statutorily 12 required public notice shall be heard by the Iowa public 13 information board created pursuant to section 23.3 as a 14 contested case proceeding pursuant to chapter 17A. The Iowa 15 public information board shall award the prevailing party 16 reasonable costs and attorney fees. 17 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 9J.6 Rules. 18 The secretary of state may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 19 17A for the implementation of this chapter. 20 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 9J.7 Public notice changes ââ 21 notification. 22 The legislative services agency shall place on the internet 23 site of the agency information regarding the requirements for 24 the posting of public notice pursuant to this chapter. This 25 section is repealed effective July 1, 2030. 26 Sec. 9. Section 445.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Until July 1, 2030, information regarding 29 the requirements for the posting of public notice pursuant to 30 chapter 9J. This paragraph is repealed effective July 1, 2030. 31 DIVISION II 32 CONFORMING CHANGES 33 Sec. 10. Section 6B.2A, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 34 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -5- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 5/ 58 S.F. _____ The acquiring agency shall cause a notice to be published 1 once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or 2 city where the agricultural land is located. The notice shall 3 be published as provided in chapter 9J at least four but no 4 more than twenty days before the public hearing is held as 5 referred to in subsection 1 . The published notice shall, at a 6 minimum, include the following information: 7 Sec. 11. Section 6B.4, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, 8 is amended to read as follows: 9 b. The chief judge or the judgeâs designee shall name a 10 chairperson from the persons selected and may appoint such 11 alternate members and chairpersons to the commission as are 12 deemed necessary and appropriate under the circumstances. A 13 person shall not be selected as a member or alternate member 14 of the compensation commission if the person possesses any 15 interest in the proceeding which would cause the person to 16 render a biased decision. The applicant shall mail a copy 17 of the list of commissioners and alternates appointed by the 18 chief judge by certified mail to the property owner at the 19 ownerâs last known address. The applicant shall also cause 20 the list of commissioners and alternates to be published 21 once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county as 22 provided in chapter 9J , not less than four nor more than twenty 23 days before the meeting of the compensation commission to 24 assess the damages. Service of the list of commissioners and 25 alternates by publication shall be deemed complete on the day 26 of publication. In lieu of mailing and publishing the list 27 of commissioners and alternates, the applicant may cause the 28 list to be served upon the owner of the property in the manner 29 provided by the Iowa rules of civil procedure for the personal 30 service of original notice. The list of commissioners and 31 alternates shall be mailed and published or served, as above 32 provided, prior to or contemporaneously with service of the 33 notice of assessment as provided in section 6B.8 . 34 Sec. 12. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 35 -6- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 6/ 58 S.F. _____ subparagraphs (1), (2), and (3), Code 2026, are amended to read 1 as follows: 2 (1) If the political subdivision is a county, notice of the 3 public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor more 4 than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county newspapers 5 selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 9J . 6 (2) If the political subdivision is a city, notice of the 7 public hearing shall be published pursuant to section 362.3 in 8 a newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 9 circulation in the city. However, if the city has with a 10 population of two hundred or less, publication may be made by 11 posting in three public places in the city. 12 (3) If the political subdivision is a school district, 13 notice of the public hearing shall be published not less 14 than ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in 15 a newspaper published in the school district, if any, and if 16 not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the school 17 district as provided in chapter 9J . 18 Sec. 13. Section 24.9, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 19 is amended to read as follows: 20 a. Each municipality shall file with the secretary or clerk 21 thereof the estimates required to be made in sections 24.3 22 through 24.8 , at least twenty days before the date fixed by 23 law for certifying the same to the levying board and shall 24 forthwith fix a date for a hearing on the estimates, and 25 shall publish such estimates and any annual levies previously 26 authorized as provided in section 76.2 , with a notice of the 27 time when and the place where such hearing shall be held not 28 less than ten nor more than twenty days before the hearing. 29 Provided that in municipalities of less than two hundred 30 population such estimates and the notice of hearing shall 31 be posted in three public places in the district in lieu of 32 publication. For any other municipality such Such publication 33 shall be in a newspaper published in the municipality, if any, 34 if not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the 35 -7- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 7/ 58 S.F. _____ municipality as provided in chapter 9J . 1 Sec. 14. Section 26A.3, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 b. The request for statements of qualifications shall be 4 posted not less than thirteen and not more than forty-five days 5 before the date for response in a relevant contractor plan room 6 service with statewide circulation, in a relevant construction 7 lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 8 internet site sponsored by either a governmental entity or a 9 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 10 as provided in chapter 9J . If circumstances beyond the control 11 of the governmental entity require postponement and there are 12 no changes to the projectâs contract documents, a notice of 13 the revised date shall be posted not less than four and not 14 more than forty-five days before the revised date for answering 15 the request for proposals and statements of qualifications 16 in a relevant contractor plan room service with statewide 17 circulation, in a relevant construction lead generating service 18 with statewide circulation, and on an internet site sponsored 19 by either a government entity or a statewide association that 20 represents the governmental entity as provided in chapter 9J . 21 Sec. 15. Section 26A.3, subsection 5, paragraph a, 22 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 (1) The construction manager-at-risk shall prepare a 24 request for statements of qualifications. The request shall 25 include general information on the project site, project 26 scope, schedule, selection criteria, and the time and place 27 for receipt of statements of qualifications. The construction 28 manager-at-risk shall provide public notice of the request for 29 statements of qualifications in a relevant contractor plan room 30 service with statewide circulation, a relevant construction 31 lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 32 internet site sponsored by either a governmental entity or a 33 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 34 as provided in chapter 9J . The request for statements of 35 -8- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 8/ 58 S.F. _____ qualifications shall be posted not less than thirteen and not 1 more than forty-five days before the date for response. 2 Sec. 16. Section 28A.5, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 Upon petition of eligible electors of a metropolitan area 5 equal in number to at least ten percent of the persons who 6 voted in the last general election held in the metropolitan 7 area for the office of president of the United States or 8 governor, the governing body of the county shall adopt a 9 resolution signifying its intention to initiate the question 10 of participating in the creation of an authority and shall 11 publish the resolution at least once in a newspaper of general 12 circulation in the metropolitan area as provided in chapter 9J 13 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 14 metropolitan areaâs entry into the authority. The resolution 15 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 16 hearing, and shall contain all of the following information: 17 Sec. 17. Section 28A.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 3. The board shall set a time and place for a public hearing 20 on the budget before the final certification date and shall 21 publish notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more than 22 twenty days prior to the hearing in one or more newspapers 23 serving the greater metropolitan area as provided in chapter 24 9J . Proof of publication shall be filed with and preserved by 25 the treasurer. 26 Sec. 18. Section 28A.21, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 2. A proposed action of the board, and a proposed 29 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 30 body of the owner of the facilities. If the governing body 31 of a county, city, commission, or authority desires to sell, 32 lease, lend, grant, or convey to the authority a facility 33 or any part of a facility, the governing body shall adopt a 34 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 35 -9- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 9/ 58 S.F. _____ the resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 1 circulation in the county and in a newspaper or newspapers, if 2 necessary, of general circulation in the area served by the 3 county, city, commission, or authority as provided in chapter 4 9J giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of 5 the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. The resolution 6 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 7 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, the 8 county, city, commission, or authority shall enact an ordinance 9 authorizing the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 10 Sec. 19. Section 28J.9, subsection 18, paragraph d, 11 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 (1) If a contract is to be negotiated and awarded without 13 competitive bidding for the reason set forth in paragraph âcâ , 14 subparagraph (2), the port authority shall publish a notice 15 calling for technical proposals at least twice, with at least 16 seven days between publications, in a newspaper of general 17 circulation in the area of the port authority as provided in 18 chapter 9J . After receipt of the technical proposals, the 19 port authority may negotiate with and award a contract for the 20 improvement to the person making the proposal considered to be 21 the most advantageous to the port authority. 22 Sec. 20. Section 37.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 37.4 Notice. 25 Notice of the election shall be given by publication in 26 one newspaper published or having general circulation in the 27 city as provided in section 362.3 as provided in chapter 9J . 28 The notice shall state the purpose of the memorial proposed as 29 outlined in section 37.18 . 30 Sec. 21. Section 49.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. The board of supervisors or city council shall publish 33 notice of changes in the county or city precinct boundaries 34 in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county 35 -10- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 10/ 58 S.F. _____ or city as provided in chapter 9J once each week for three 1 consecutive weeks. The series of publications shall be made 2 after the changes in the precincts have been approved by 3 the state commissioner of elections. The last of the three 4 publications shall be made no later than thirty days before the 5 next general election. A map showing the new boundaries may be 6 used. No publication is necessary if no changes were made. 7 Sec. 22. Section 49.53, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 2. The notice shall be published in at least one newspaper, 10 as defined in section 618.3 , which is published in the county 11 or other political subdivision in which the election is to 12 occur or, if no newspaper is published there, in at least 13 one newspaper of substantial circulation in the county or 14 political subdivision. For the general election or the primary 15 election the foregoing notice shall be published in at least 16 two newspapers published in the county. However, if there is 17 only one newspaper published in the county, publication in one 18 newspaper shall be sufficient as provided in chapter 9J . 19 Sec. 23. Section 69.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 2. If the status of an officeholder is in question, the 22 entity or officer responsible for making an appointment to 23 fill the vacancy shall decide whether a vacancy exists. The 24 appointing entity or officer may act upon its own motion. If 25 a petition signed by twenty-five registered voters of the 26 jurisdiction is received, the appointing entity or officer 27 shall convene within thirty days to consider whether a vacancy 28 exists. The appointing entity or officer shall publish notice 29 as provided in chapter 9J that a public hearing will be held to 30 determine whether a vacancy exists. The notice shall include 31 the time and place of the hearing and the name of the office 32 and the officeholder whose status is in question. The public 33 hearing shall be held not less than four nor more than fourteen 34 days after publication of the notice. The officer whose status 35 -11- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 11/ 58 S.F. _____ is in question shall be notified of the time and place of the 1 hearing. Notice shall be sent by certified mail and must be 2 postmarked at least fourteen days before the hearing. No later 3 than seven days after the public hearing, the appointing entity 4 or officer shall publish its decision. If the appointing 5 entity or officer decides that the office is vacant, the 6 publication shall state the date the vacancy occurred and what 7 action will be taken to fill the vacancy. 8 Sec. 24. Section 73A.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 73A.12 Issuance of bonds ââ notice. 11 Before any municipality shall institute proceedings for 12 the issuance of any bonds or other evidence of indebtedness 13 payable from taxation, excepting such bonds or other evidence 14 of indebtedness as have been authorized by a vote of the people 15 of such municipality, and except such bonds or obligations 16 as it may be by law compelled to issue, a notice of such 17 action, including a statement of the amount and purpose of said 18 bonds or other evidence of indebtedness shall be published at 19 least once in a newspaper of general circulation within such 20 municipality as provided in chapter 9J at least ten days before 21 the meeting at which it is proposed to issue such bonds. 22 Sec. 25. Section 74A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 2. The treasurer may offer the warrants for public sale at 25 par, by publishing notice of the sale for two consecutive weeks 26 in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction of 27 the school district issuing the warrants as provided in chapter 28 9J , giving not less than ten daysâ notice of the time and place 29 of the sale. The notice shall include a statement of the 30 amount of the warrants offered for sale. 31 Sec. 26. Section 75.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 75.2 Notice of sale. 34 When public bonds are offered for sale, the official in 35 -12- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 12/ 58 S.F. _____ charge of the bond issue shall, by advertisement published 1 at least once, the last one of which shall be not less than 2 four nor more than twenty days before the sale in a newspaper 3 located in the county or a county contiguous to the place of 4 sale as provided in chapter 9J , give notice of the time and 5 place of sale of the bonds, the amount to be offered for sale, 6 and any further information which the official deems pertinent. 7 Sec. 27. Section 80.39, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 1. Personal property, except for motor vehicles subject to 10 sale pursuant to section 321.89 , and seizable property subject 11 to disposition pursuant to chapter 809 or 809A , which personal 12 property is found or seized by, turned in to, or otherwise 13 lawfully comes into the possession of the department or a local 14 law enforcement agency and which the department or agency does 15 not own, shall be disposed of pursuant to this section . If by 16 examining the property the owner or lawful custodian of the 17 property is known or can be readily ascertained, the department 18 or agency shall notify the owner or custodian by certified mail 19 directed to the ownerâs or custodianâs last known address, as 20 to the location of the property. If the identity or address of 21 the owner cannot be determined, notice by one publication in a 22 newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property 23 was found as provided in chapter 9J is sufficient notice. A 24 published notice may contain multiple items. 25 Sec. 28. Section 137.104, subsection 1, paragraph b, 26 subparagraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4), Code 2026, are amended 27 to read as follows: 28 (1) Rules of a city board shall become effective upon 29 approval by the city council and publication in a newspaper 30 having general circulation in the city as provided in chapter 31 9J . 32 (2) Rules of a county board shall become effective upon 33 approval by the county board of supervisors by a motion or 34 resolution as defined in section 331.101, subsection 13 , and 35 -13- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 13/ 58 S.F. _____ publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the 1 county as provided in chapter 9J . 2 (3) Rules of a district board shall become effective upon 3 approval by the district board and publication in a newspaper 4 having general circulation in the district as provided in 5 chapter 9J . 6 (4) Before approving any rule or regulation the local board 7 of health shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rule. 8 Any citizen may appear and be heard at the public hearing. A 9 notice of the public hearing, stating the time and place and 10 the general nature of the proposed rule or regulation shall be 11 published in a newspaper having general circulation as provided 12 in section 331.305 in the area served by the local board of 13 health chapter 9J . 14 Sec. 29. Section 145A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 145A.5 Order of approval. 17 When a plan is approved, the officials approving the plan 18 shall jointly issue an order of approval. The order shall 19 specify the area to be merged, the maximum rate of tax to 20 be levied for debt service and operation and maintenance of 21 the proposed area hospital in the portion of the merged area 22 within each political subdivision, the proposed location of 23 the hospital building, the estimated cost of the establishment 24 of the hospital, and any other details concerning the 25 establishment and operation of the hospital the officials 26 deem pertinent. The order shall be published in one or more 27 newspapers which have general circulation within the merged 28 area as provided in chapter 9J once each week for three 29 consecutive weeks , but the newspapers selected need not be 30 published in the merged area . The published order shall 31 contain a notice to the residents of each subdivision of the 32 proposed merged area that if the residents fail to protest as 33 provided in this chapter , the order shall be deemed approved 34 upon the expiration of a sixty-day period following the date 35 -14- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 14/ 58 S.F. _____ of the last published notice. 1 Sec. 30. Section 161A.3, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 8. âDue noticeâ means notice published at least twice, 4 with an interval of at least six days between the two 5 publication dates, in a newspaper or other publication of 6 general circulation within the appropriate area; or, if no 7 such publication of general circulation be available, by 8 posting at a reasonable number of conspicuous places within 9 the appropriate area, such posting to include, where possible, 10 posting at public places where it may be customary to post 11 notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally as 12 provided in chapter 9J . At any hearing held pursuant to such 13 notice, at the time and place designated in such notice, 14 adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity 15 of renewing such notice for such adjourned dates. 16 Sec. 31. Section 161A.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 161A.16 Publication of notice. 19 The notice of hearing on the formation of a subdistrict shall 20 be by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in 21 some newspaper of general circulation published in the county 22 or district as provided in chapter 9J , the last of which shall 23 be not less than ten days prior to the day set for the hearing 24 on the petition. Proof of such service shall be made by 25 affidavit of the publisher, and be on file with the secretary 26 of the district at the time the hearing begins. 27 Sec. 32. Section 161A.45, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 161A.45 Submission of regulations to division ââ hearing. 30 Regulations which the commissioners propose to adopt, 31 amend, or repeal shall be submitted to the division, in a form 32 prescribed by the division, for its approval. The division may 33 approve the regulations as submitted, or with amendments as 34 it deems necessary. The commissioners shall, after approval, 35 -15- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 15/ 58 S.F. _____ publish notice of hearing on the proposed regulations, as 1 approved, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district 2 as provided in chapter 9J , setting a date and time not less 3 than ten nor more than thirty days after the publication when a 4 hearing on the proposed regulations will be held at a specified 5 place. The notice shall include the full text of the proposed 6 regulations or shall state that the proposed regulations are 7 on file and available for review at the office of the affected 8 soil and water conservation district. 9 Sec. 33. Section 173.14B, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 9. The board shall publish a notice of intention to 12 issue bonds or notes in a newspaper published and of general 13 circulation in the state as provided in chapter 9J . The notice 14 shall include a statement of the maximum amount of bonds or 15 notes proposed to be issued, and in general, what net revenues 16 will be pledged to pay the bonds or notes and interest on them. 17 An action shall not be brought questioning the legality of the 18 bonds or notes, the power of the board to issue the bonds or 19 notes, or the legality of any proceedings in connection with 20 the authorization or issuance of the bonds or notes after sixty 21 days from the date of publication of the notice. 22 Sec. 34. Section 174.17, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. A fair may institute proceedings for the issuance 25 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 26 bonds to be published at least once in a newspaper of general 27 circulation within the county as provided in chapter 9J at 28 least ten days prior to the meeting at which the fair proposes 29 to take action for the issuance of the bonds. The notice shall 30 include a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, the 31 maximum rate of interest the bonds are to bear, and the right 32 to petition for an election. 33 Sec. 35. Section 182.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -16- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 16/ 58 S.F. _____ 1. The secretary shall give notice of the referendum on 1 the question of whether to establish an Iowa sheep and wool 2 promotion board and to impose the assessment by publishing the 3 notice for a period of not less than five days in at least one 4 newspaper of general circulation in the state as provided in 5 chapter 9J . The notice shall state the voting places, period 6 of time for voting, and other information deemed necessary by 7 the secretary. 8 Sec. 36. Section 256.11, subsection 16, paragraph c, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 c. If the state board takes preliminary action to remove 11 an agency from the approved list published on the departmentâs 12 internet site pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the department 13 shall, at least one year prior to removing the agency from 14 the approved list, notify the nonpublic schools participating 15 in the accreditation process offered by the agency of the 16 state boardâs intent to remove the accrediting agency from its 17 approved list of independent accrediting agencies. The notice 18 shall also be posted on the departmentâs internet site as 19 provided in chapter 9J and shall contain the proposed date of 20 removal. The nonpublic school shall attain accreditation under 21 this subsection or subsections 1 through 12 not later than one 22 year following the date on which the state board removes the 23 agency from its list of independent accrediting agencies. 24 Sec. 37. Section 257.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 1. An instructional support program that provides 27 additional funding for school districts is established. A 28 board of directors that wishes to consider participating in 29 the instructional support program shall hold a public hearing 30 on the question of participation. The board shall set forth 31 its proposal, including the method that will be used to fund 32 the program, in a resolution and shall publish the notice of 33 the time and place of a public hearing on the resolution. 34 Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be 35 -17- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 17/ 58 S.F. _____ published not less than ten nor more than twenty days before 1 the public hearing in a newspaper which is a newspaper of 2 general circulation in the school district as provided in 3 chapter 9J . At the hearing, or no later than thirty days 4 after the date of the hearing, the board shall take action 5 to adopt a resolution to participate in the instructional 6 support program for a period not exceeding five years or to 7 direct the county commissioner of elections to submit the 8 question of participation in the program for a period not 9 exceeding ten years to the registered voters of the school 10 district at an election held on a date specified in section 11 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . If the board submits the 12 question at an election and a majority of those voting on the 13 question favors participation in the program, the board shall 14 adopt a resolution to participate and certify the results of 15 the election to the department of management. 16 Sec. 38. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph o, 17 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 (2) Prior to filing a request for supplemental aid or a 19 modified supplemental amount based on the grounds specified 20 in this paragraph, the board of directors shall hold a public 21 hearing on the issue and shall publish the notice of the time 22 and place of the public hearing. Notice of the time and place 23 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 24 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 25 that is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 26 district as provided in chapter 9J . 27 Sec. 39. Section 257B.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 257B.5 Notice ââ sale. 30 When the board of supervisors shall offer for 31 sale the sixteenth section or lands selected in lieu 32 thereof, or any portion of the same, or any part of the 33 five-hundred-thousand-acre grant, the county auditor shall give 34 at least forty daysâ notice, by written or printed notices 35 -18- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 18/ 58 S.F. _____ posted in five public places in the county, two of which shall 1 be in the township in which the land to be sold is situated, 2 and also publish a notice of said sale once each week for two 3 weeks preceding the same in a newspaper published in the county 4 as provided in chapter 9J , describing the land to be sold and 5 the time and place of such sale. At such time and place, or at 6 such other time and place as the sale may be adjourned to, the 7 county auditor shall offer to the highest bidder, subject to 8 the provisions of this chapter , and sell, either for cash or 9 one-third cash and the balance on a credit not exceeding ten 10 years, with interest on the same at the rate of not less than 11 three and one-half percent per annum, to be paid at the office 12 of the county treasurer of said county on the first day of 13 January in each year, delinquent interest to bear the same rate 14 as the principal. Such county treasurer shall pay to the state 15 treasurer on the first day of February all interest collected. 16 Sec. 40. Section 260C.14, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 12. During the second week of August of each year, publish 19 by one insertion in at least one newspaper published in the 20 merged area as provided in chapter 9J a summarized statement 21 verified by affidavit of the secretary of the board showing 22 the receipts and disbursements of all funds of the community 23 college for the preceding fiscal year. The statement of 24 disbursements shall show the names of the persons, firms, 25 or corporations, and the total amount paid to each during 26 the fiscal year. The board is not required to make the 27 publications and notices required under sections 279.35 and 28 279.36 . 29 Sec. 41. Section 261A.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 261A.25 Notice. 32 The authority shall publish a notice of its intention 33 to issue obligations in a newspaper published in and with 34 general circulation in the state as provided in chapter 9J . 35 -19- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 19/ 58 S.F. _____ The notice shall include a statement of the maximum amount 1 of obligations proposed to be issued, and in general terms, 2 what receipts will be pledged to pay bond service charges on 3 the obligations. An action which questions the legality or 4 validity of the obligations or the power of the authority to 5 issue the obligations or the effectiveness or validity of any 6 proceedings adopted for the authorization or issuance of the 7 obligations shall not be brought after sixty days from the date 8 of publication of the notice. 9 Sec. 42. Section 273.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. Notice of the election shall be published by the area 12 education agency administrator not later than September 15 of 13 the odd-numbered year in at least one newspaper of general 14 circulation in the director district as provided in chapter 9J . 15 The cost of publication shall be paid by the area education 16 agency. 17 Sec. 43. Section 273.8, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 3. Director district convention. If no candidate files with 20 the area education agency secretary by the deadline specified 21 in subsection 2 , or a vacancy occurs, or if otherwise required 22 as provided in section 273.23, subsection 3 , a director 23 district convention, attended by members of the boards of 24 directors of the local school districts located within the 25 director district, shall be called to elect a board member 26 described in subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , for that director 27 district. The convention location shall be determined by the 28 area education agency administrator. Notice of the time, 29 date, and place of a director district convention shall be 30 published by the area education agency administrator in at 31 least one newspaper of general circulation in the director 32 district as provided in chapter 9J at least thirty days prior 33 to the day of the convention. The cost of publication shall be 34 paid by the area education agency. A candidate for election 35 -20- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 20/ 58 S.F. _____ to the area education agency board shall file a statement 1 of candidacy with the area education agency secretary at 2 least ten days prior to the date of the director district 3 convention on forms prescribed by the department of education, 4 or nominations may be made at the convention by a delegate from 5 a board of directors of a school district located within the 6 director district. A statement of candidacy shall include the 7 candidateâs name, address, and school district. Delegates to 8 director district conventions shall not be bound by a school 9 board or any school board member to pledge their votes to any 10 candidate prior to the date of the convention. 11 Sec. 44. Section 273.27, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 14 proposal with the affected area education agency board, the 15 affected board shall fix a date for a hearing on the proposal, 16 which shall not be more than sixty days after the dissolution 17 petition was filed with the affected board. The affected board 18 shall publish notice of the date, time, and location of the 19 hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing by 20 one publication in a newspaper in general circulation in the 21 area as provided in chapter 9J . The notice shall include the 22 contents of the dissolution proposal. 23 Sec. 45. Section 275.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 1. Within ten days after the petition is filed, the area 26 education agency administrator shall fix a final date for 27 filing objections to the petition which shall be not more than 28 sixty days after the petition is filed and shall fix the date 29 for a hearing on the objections to the petition. Objections 30 shall be filed in the office of the administrator who shall 31 give notice at least ten days prior to the final day for 32 filing objections, by one publication in a newspaper published 33 within the territory described in the petition, or if none is 34 published in the territory, in a newspaper published in the 35 -21- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 21/ 58 S.F. _____ county where the petition is filed, and of general circulation 1 in the territory described as provided in chapter 9J . The 2 notice shall also list the date, time, and location for the 3 hearing on the petition as provided in section 275.15 . The 4 cost of publication shall be assessed to each district whose 5 territory is involved in the ratio that the number of pupils 6 in basic enrollment for the budget year, as defined in section 7 257.6 in each district bears to the total number of pupils 8 in basic enrollment for the budget year in the total area 9 involved. Objections shall be in writing in the form of an 10 affidavit and may be made by any person residing or owning land 11 within the territory described in the petition, or who would 12 be injuriously affected by the change petitioned for and shall 13 be on file not later than 12:00 noon of the final day fixed for 14 filing objections. 15 Sec. 46. Section 275.15, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 4. The administrator shall at once publish the decision 18 in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 9J in the same 19 manner in which the original notice was published. Within 20 twenty days after the publication, the decision rendered by the 21 area education agency board may be appealed to the district 22 court in the county involved by any school district affected. 23 For purposes of appeal, only those school districts who filed 24 reorganization petitions are school districts affected. An 25 appeal from a decision of an area education agency board or 26 joint area education agency boards under section 275.4 , 275.16 , 27 or this section is subject to appeal procedures under this 28 chapter and is not subject to appeal under chapter 290 . 29 Sec. 47. Section 275.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 2. Votes of each member of an area education agency board in 32 attendance shall be weighted so that the total number of votes 33 eligible to be cast by members of each board in attendance 34 shall be equal. However, if the joint boards cast a tie vote 35 -22- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 22/ 58 S.F. _____ and are unable to agree to a decision fixing the boundaries for 1 the proposed school corporation or to a decision to dismiss the 2 petition, the time during which actions must be taken under 3 section 275.15 shall be extended from ten days to fifteen days 4 after the conclusion of the hearing under section 275.15 , and 5 the joint board shall reconvene not less than ten and not more 6 than fifteen days after the conclusion of the hearing. At the 7 hearing the joint board shall reconsider its action and if a 8 tie vote is again cast it is a decision granting the petition 9 and changing the plans of any and all of the agency boards 10 affected by the petition and fixing the boundaries for the 11 proposed school corporation. The agency administrator shall at 12 once publish the decision in the same newspaper as provided in 13 chapter 9J in the same manner in which the original notice was 14 published. 15 Sec. 48. Section 275.18, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. The county commissioner of elections shall give notice 18 of the election by one publication in the same newspaper as 19 provided in chapter 9J in the same manner in which previous 20 notices have been published regarding the proposed school 21 reorganization, and in addition, if more than one county 22 is involved, by one publication in a legal newspaper as 23 provided in chapter 9J in each county other than that of the 24 first publication. The publication shall be not less than 25 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. If 26 the decision published pursuant to section 275.15 or 275.16 27 includes a description of the proposed school corporation and 28 a description of the director districts, if any, the notice 29 for election and the ballot do not need to include these 30 descriptions. Notice for an election shall not be published 31 until the expiration of time for appeal, which shall be the 32 same as that provided in section 275.15 or 275.16 , whichever is 33 applicable; and if there is an appeal, not until the appeal has 34 been disposed of. 35 -23- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 23/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 49. Section 275.54, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 3 proposal with the board, the board shall fix a date for a 4 hearing on the proposal which shall not be more than sixty days 5 after the dissolution petition was filed with the board. The 6 board shall publish notice of the date, time, and location of 7 the hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing 8 by one publication in a newspaper in general circulation in the 9 district as provided in chapter 9J . The notice shall include 10 the content of the dissolution proposal. A person residing or 11 owning land in the school district may present evidence and 12 arguments at the hearing. The president of the board shall 13 preside at the hearing. The board shall review testimony from 14 the hearing and shall adopt or amend and adopt the dissolution 15 proposal. 16 Sec. 50. Section 275.55, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 2. The board shall give written notice of the election to 19 the county commissioner of elections. The county commissioner 20 of elections shall give notice of the election by one 21 publication in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 9J 22 in the same manner in which the previous notice was published 23 about the hearing, which publication shall not be less than 24 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. 25 Sec. 51. Section 279.36, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 279.36 Publication procedures and fee . 28 1. The requirements of section 279.35 are satisfied by 29 publication in at least one newspaper published in the district 30 or, if there is none, in at least one newspaper having general 31 circulation within the district as provided in chapter 9J . 32 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, and each 33 fiscal year thereafter, the fee for the publications shall be 34 the legal publication fee provided by section 618.11 . 35 -24- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 24/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 52. Section 303.44, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 1 is amended to read as follows: 2 The board of supervisors to whom the petition is addressed, 3 at its next regular, special, or adjourned meeting, shall set 4 the time and place when it will meet for a hearing upon the 5 petition, and direct the county auditor in whose office the 6 petition is filed to cause notice to be given to all persons 7 whom it may concern, without naming them, of the pendency and 8 prayer of the petition, by publication of a notice once each 9 week for two consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general 10 circulation published as provided in chapter 9J in the proposed 11 district. The last publication shall not be less than twenty 12 days prior to the date set for the hearing of the petition. 13 If no such newspaper is published in the proposed district, 14 then notice shall be by posting at least five copies of the 15 notice in the proposed district at least twenty days before the 16 hearing. Proof of giving notice shall be made by affidavit 17 of the publisher or affidavit of the person who posted the 18 notices, and the proof shall be on file with the county auditor 19 at the time the hearing begins. The notice of hearing shall 20 be directed to all persons it may concern, and shall state the 21 following: 22 Sec. 53. Section 303.46, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 303.46 Notice of election. 25 In its order for the election the board of supervisors shall 26 direct the county auditor to cause notice of the election to 27 be given by posting at least five copies of the notice in 28 public places in the proposed district at least twenty days 29 before the date of election and by publication of the notice 30 once each week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of 31 general circulation published as provided in chapter 9J in the 32 proposed district , or, if no such newspaper is published within 33 the proposed district, then in such a newspaper published in 34 the county in which the major part of the proposed district is 35 -25- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 25/ 58 S.F. _____ located . The last publication is to be at least twenty days 1 prior to the date of election. The notice shall state the 2 time and place of holding the election and the hours when the 3 polls will be open and closed, the purpose of the election, 4 with the name of the proposed district and a description of 5 its boundaries, and shall set forth briefly the limits of each 6 voting precinct and the location of the polling places. Proof 7 of posting and publication shall be made in the manner provided 8 in section 303.44 and filed with the county auditor. 9 Sec. 54. Section 303.52, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 3. The board of trustees shall provide for the manner in 12 which the land use plan shall be established and enforced and 13 amended, supplemented, or changed. However, a plan shall not 14 become effective until after a public hearing on it, at which 15 parties in interest and citizens of the district shall have an 16 opportunity to be heard. At least fifteen daysâ notice of the 17 time and place of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper 18 of general circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the 19 district giving the time, date, and location of the public 20 hearing. 21 Sec. 55. Section 306.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 306.12 Notice ââ service. 24 Notice of the hearing under section 306.11 shall be 25 published in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 26 chapter 9J in the county or counties where the road is located, 27 not less than four nor more than twenty days prior to the date 28 of hearing. The agency which is holding the hearing shall 29 notify all adjoining property owners, all utility companies 30 whose facilities adjoin the road right-of-way or are on the 31 road right-of-way, and the department, boards of supervisors, 32 or agency in control of affected state lands, of the time and 33 place of the hearing, by certified mail. 34 Sec. 56. Section 309.96, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 35 -26- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 26/ 58 S.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 2. In the event that a county secondary road budget or 2 amended budget thereto is disapproved by the department, the 3 county may elect either to revise such budget or amended budget 4 so as to receive approval or the county may elect to operate 5 with such disapproved budget or amended budget. In the event 6 the county secondary road budget is disapproved in whole or 7 in part, within twenty days after receipt of the departmentâs 8 report, the board of supervisors shall cause to be published in 9 the official newspapers of the county as provided in chapter 10 9J , notice of a public hearing to be held within ten days of 11 said publication, on the departmentâs recommendations, and at 12 said hearing the board of supervisors shall amend or adopt 13 their original budget. 14 Sec. 57. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph g, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 g. If it is impossible to determine with reasonable 17 certainty the identities and addresses of the last registered 18 owner and all lienholders, notice by one publication in 19 one newspaper of general circulation in the area where the 20 vehicle was abandoned as provided in chapter 9J shall be 21 sufficient to meet all requirements of notice under this 22 section . The published notice may contain multiple listings of 23 abandoned vehicles but shall be published within the same time 24 requirements and contain the same information as prescribed for 25 mailed notice in this subsection . 26 Sec. 58. Section 321.236, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 b. Before establishing a rural residence district, the board 29 of supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the proposal, 30 notice of which shall be published in a newspaper having a 31 general circulation as provided in chapter 9J in the area where 32 the proposed district is located at least twenty days before 33 the date of hearing. The notice shall state the time and place 34 of the hearing, the proposed location of the district, and 35 -27- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 27/ 58 S.F. _____ other data considered pertinent by the board of supervisors. 1 Sec. 59. Section 330A.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 2 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 Whenever the governing body of any municipality shall desire 4 to participate in the creation of an authority it shall adopt a 5 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 6 said resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 7 circulation as provided in chapter 9J in such municipality 8 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 9 municipalityâs entry into such authority. Such resolution 10 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 11 hearing, and shall contain therein the following information: 12 Sec. 60. Section 330A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. A municipality wishing to withdraw from or to become a 15 member of an existing authority shall signify its intention by 16 resolution and shall publish the resolution at least one time 17 in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 18 9J in the municipality giving notice of a hearing to be held 19 on the question of withdrawing or joining and its intention 20 to withdraw or join. The resolution shall be published at 21 least fourteen days prior to the date of the hearing. A 22 withdrawing municipality shall state in the resolution how it 23 intends to pay its portion of the outstanding obligations of 24 the authority, if any. A joining municipality shall state in 25 the resolution the information required in section 330A.6 . A 26 copy of the resolution shall be certified to the authority 27 by the municipality at least fourteen days in advance of the 28 hearing. The board shall by resolution indicate whether a 29 satisfactory provision has been made for the payment of the 30 outstanding obligations of the authority, as required under 31 subsection 1 . After the hearing and if the outstanding 32 obligations of the authority have been adequately provided for 33 by the municipality, the municipality may enact an ordinance to 34 withdraw from or join the authority. 35 -28- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 28/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 61. Section 330A.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The proposed action of an authority, and the proposed 3 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 4 body of the owner of the aviation facilities. Whenever the 5 governing body of any municipality, airport commission, or 6 authority, shall desire to sell, lease, lend, grant, or convey 7 to the authority, any aviation facilities or any part or parts 8 thereof, as aforesaid, it shall adopt a resolution signifying 9 its intention to do so and shall publish said resolution 10 at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation as 11 provided in chapter 9J in said municipality and in a newspaper 12 or newspapers , if necessary, of general circulation of in the 13 area served by said airport commission or authority giving 14 notice of a hearing to be held on the question of said sale, 15 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. Such resolution shall 16 be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 17 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, said 18 municipality shall enact an ordinance authorizing said sale, 19 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance and said airport commission 20 or authority shall pass a resolution authorizing said sale, 21 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 22 Sec. 62. Section 331.207, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 2. The petition shall be filed with the county commissioner 25 by June 1 of an odd-numbered year, subject to subsection 7 . 26 The special election shall be held on the first Tuesday after 27 the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered year. Notice 28 of the special election shall be published once each week for 29 three successive weeks in an official newspaper of the county 30 as provided in chapter 9J , shall state the representation plans 31 to be submitted to the electors, and shall state the date of 32 the special election. The last in the series of publications 33 shall occur not less than four nor more than twenty days before 34 the election. 35 -29- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 29/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 63. Section 331.302, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 8. A resolution becomes effective upon passage and an 3 ordinance or amendment becomes a law when a summary of the 4 ordinance or the complete text of the ordinance is published 5 as provided in chapter 9J , unless a subsequent effective date 6 is provided within the measure. As used in this subsection , 7 âsummaryâ shall mean a narrative description of the terms and 8 conditions of an ordinance setting forth the main points of 9 the ordinance in a manner calculated to inform the public in a 10 clear and understandable manner the meaning of the ordinance 11 and which shall provide the public with sufficient notice to 12 conform to the desired conduct required by the ordinance. 13 The description shall include the title of the ordinance, 14 an accurate and intelligible abstract or synopsis of the 15 essential elements of the ordinance, a statement that the 16 description is a summary, the location and the normal business 17 hours of the office where the ordinance may be inspected, when 18 the ordinance becomes effective, and the full text of any 19 provisions imposing fines, penalties, forfeitures, fees, or 20 taxes. Legal descriptions of property set forth in ordinances 21 shall be described in full, provided that maps or charts may be 22 substituted for legal descriptions when they contain sufficient 23 detail to clearly define the area with which the ordinance is 24 concerned. The narrative description shall be written in a 25 clear and coherent manner and shall, to the extent possible, 26 avoid the use of technical or legal terms not generally 27 familiar to the public. When necessary to use technical or 28 legal terms not generally familiar to the public, the narrative 29 description shall include definitions of those terms. 30 Sec. 64. Section 331.305, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 1. Unless otherwise provided by state law, if notice of an 33 election, hearing, or other official action is required by this 34 chapter , the board shall publish the notice at least once, not 35 -30- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 30/ 58 S.F. _____ less than four nor more than twenty days before the date of the 1 election, hearing, or other action, in one or more newspapers 2 which meet the requirements of section 618.14 as provided in 3 chapter 9J . Notice of an election shall also comply with 4 section 49.53 . 5 Sec. 65. Section 331.385, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 2. The board of supervisors shall publish notice of the 8 proposed resolution, and of a public hearing to be held on the 9 proposed resolution, in a newspaper of general circulation as 10 provided in chapter 9J in the county at least ten days but no 11 more than twenty days before the date of the public hearing. 12 If, after notice and hearing, the resolution is adopted, the 13 board of supervisors shall assume the exercise of the powers 14 and duties of township trustees relating to fire protection 15 service and emergency medical service as set forth in sections 16 359.42 through 359.45 . 17 Sec. 66. Section 331.425, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 5. Notice of the proposed special levy election shall be 20 published at least twice in a newspaper as specified in section 21 331.305 as provided in chapter 9J prior to the date of the 22 special levy election. The first notice shall appear as early 23 as practicable after the board has decided to seek a special 24 levy. 25 Sec. 67. Section 331.434, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, 26 are amended to read as follows: 27 3. Following, and not until, the requirements of section 28 24.2A are completed, the board shall set a time and place for 29 a public hearing on the budget before the final certification 30 date and shall publish notice of the hearing not less than 31 ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the 32 county newspapers selected under chapter 349 as provided in 33 chapter 9J . A summary of the proposed budget and a description 34 of the procedure for protesting the county budget under 35 -31- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 31/ 58 S.F. _____ section 331.436 , in the form prescribed by the director of the 1 department of management, shall be included in the notice. 2 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 3 shall be filed with and preserved by the county auditor. A 4 levy is not valid unless and until the notice is published and 5 individual statements under section 24.2A are mailed. The 6 department of management shall prescribe the form for the 7 public hearing notice for use by counties. 8 6. The board shall appropriate, by resolution, the amounts 9 deemed necessary for each of the different county officers 10 and departments during the ensuing fiscal year. Increases 11 or decreases in these appropriations do not require a budget 12 amendment, but may be provided by resolution at a regular 13 meeting of the board, as long as each class of proposed 14 expenditures contained in the budget summary published under 15 subsection 3 of this section is not increased. However, 16 decreases in appropriations for a county officer or department 17 of more than ten percent or five thousand dollars, whichever 18 is greater, shall not be effective unless the board sets a 19 time and place for a public hearing on the proposed decrease 20 and publishes notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more 21 than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county newspapers 22 selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 9J . 23 Sec. 68. Section 331.443, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 24 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a board may institute 26 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential county 27 purpose specified in section 331.441, subsection 2 , paragraph 28 âbâ , subparagraph (18) or (19), in an amount equal to or greater 29 than three million dollars by causing a notice of the proposal 30 to issue the bonds, including a statement of the amount 31 and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate of 32 interest which the bonds are to bear, and the right to petition 33 for an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper 34 of general circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the 35 -32- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 32/ 58 S.F. _____ county at least ten days prior to the meeting at which it is 1 proposed to take action for the issuance of the bonds. 2 Sec. 69. Section 341A.6, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 6. To arrange, compile, and administer competitive tests 5 to determine the relative qualifications of persons seeking 6 employment in any class of position and as a result thereof 7 establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, 8 and provide that persons discharged because of curtailment of 9 expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head 10 the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they 11 shall be the first to be reemployed. Notice of competitive 12 tests to be given shall be published at least two weeks prior 13 to holding the tests in a newspaper of general circulation as 14 provided in chapter 9J in the county or counties in which a 15 vacancy exists. 16 Sec. 70. Section 346.27, subsection 10, paragraph b, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 b. In addition to the notice required by section 49.53 , a 19 notice of the election shall be published once each week for at 20 least two weeks in some newspaper published in the county as 21 provided in chapter 9J stating the date of the election, the 22 hours the polls will be open, and a copy of the question. The 23 authority shall call this election with the concurrence of both 24 incorporating units. The election shall be conducted by the 25 commissioner in accordance with the provisions of chapters 49 26 and 50 . 27 Sec. 71. Section 347.7, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 28 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 a. The tax levy authorized by this section for operation 30 and maintenance of the hospital may be available in whole or in 31 part to any county with or without a county hospital organized 32 under this chapter , to be used to enhance rural health services 33 in the county. However, the tax levied may be expended for 34 enhancement of rural health care services only following a 35 -33- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 33/ 58 S.F. _____ local planning process. The department of health and human 1 services shall establish guidelines to be followed by counties 2 in implementing the local planning process which shall require 3 legal notice, public hearings, and a referendum in accordance 4 with this subsection prior to the authorization of any new levy 5 or a change in the use of a levy. The notice shall describe the 6 new levy or the change in the use of the levy, indicate the date 7 and location of the hearing, and shall be published at least 8 once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper having 9 general circulation as provided in chapter 9J in the county. 10 The hearing shall not take place prior to two weeks after the 11 second publication. 12 Sec. 72. Section 349.16, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 13 is amended to read as follows: 14 There shall be published as provided in chapter 9J and in 15 each of the official newspapers at the expense of the county 16 during the ensuing year: 17 Sec. 73. Section 349.18, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 b. In addition to the requirements in paragraph âaâ , if a 20 county operates an internet site, the county auditor shall post 21 the full text of all resolutions adopted by the board on the 22 internet site as provided in chapter 9J . Any posted summary or 23 text of a full resolution shall include links directing readers 24 to information relevant to the content of the resolution. 25 Sec. 74. Section 352.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. Within thirty days of receipt of a proposal to create 28 or expand an agricultural area which meets the statutory 29 requirements, the county board shall provide notice of the 30 proposal by publishing notice in a newspaper of general 31 circulation as provided in chapter 9J in the county. Within 32 forty-five days after receipt of the proposal, the county board 33 shall hold a public hearing on the proposal. 34 Sec. 75. Section 357A.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 35 -34- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 34/ 58 S.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 2. If the supervisors find that required notice of the 2 hearing has been given and that the proposed district is 3 reasonably necessary for the public health, convenience, and 4 comfort of the residents, or may be of benefit in providing 5 fire protection, they shall make an order establishing the 6 district as a political subdivision, designating the districtâs 7 boundary, and identifying the district by name or number. The 8 order shall be published as provided in chapter 9J in the same 9 newspaper manner in which published the notice of hearing 10 was published . The supervisors shall prepare and preserve 11 a complete record of the hearing on the petition and their 12 findings and action. 13 Sec. 76. Section 357A.11, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 b. Prior to such sale, conveyance, merger, or disposition by 16 the board that includes the relinquishment of the districtâs 17 right to provide service to an area, the board shall publish 18 notice of a public hearing not less than four nor more 19 than twenty days before the date fixed for the hearing in a 20 newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 9J in 21 the area for which the board seeks to relinquish service. The 22 board shall mail notice of a public hearing to the districtâs 23 members in the area for which the board seeks to relinquish 24 service not less than fourteen days prior to such public 25 hearing. A public hearing is not required when the board 26 relinquishes the districtâs right to service an area within the 27 corporate limits of a city if the city will provide service in 28 compliance with the cityâs annexation plan. 29 Sec. 77. Section 357A.24, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. The order shall be published as provided in chapter 9J in 32 the same newspaper manner in which published the notice of the 33 hearing was published . 34 Sec. 78. Section 357B.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -35- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 35/ 58 S.F. _____ follows: 1 357B.18 Detachment of land from district. 2 The trustees of a township, after notice and a public 3 hearing, may withdraw the township or part of the township 4 from a benefited fire district. Notice of the time, date and 5 place of the hearing shall be published at least two weeks 6 before the hearing in a newspaper having general circulation as 7 provided in chapter 9J within the township. The notice shall 8 also identify the area to be withdrawn. After the hearing on 9 the proposed withdrawal, the township trustees, by majority 10 vote, may withdraw the township or a part of the township from 11 the benefited fire district. If the township trustees take 12 final action to withdraw on or before March 1 of a fiscal year, 13 the effective date of the withdrawal is the following July 1. 14 However, if final action to withdraw is taken after March 1, 15 the withdrawal is not effective until July 1 of the following 16 calendar year. If bonds issued under section 357B.4 are 17 outstanding at the time of withdrawal, the board of supervisors 18 shall continue to levy an annual tax against the taxable 19 property being withdrawn to pay its share of the outstanding 20 obligation of the district relating to those bonds. 21 Sec. 79. Section 358.40, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are 22 amended to read as follows: 23 3. The board shall examine the petition at its next meeting 24 after its filing or within twenty days of the filing, whichever 25 date is earlier. Within ten days of the meeting, the board 26 shall publish notice of the petition and the date, time, and 27 place of the meeting at which time the board proposes to take 28 action on the petition. The notice shall be published in a 29 newspaper of general circulation published in the district 30 and, if no newspaper is published within the district, in a 31 newspaper published in the county in which the major part of 32 the district is located as provided in chapter 9J . At the 33 boardâs meeting, or subsequent meetings as necessary, if the 34 petition is found to comply with the requirements of this 35 -36- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 36/ 58 S.F. _____ section and the board of trustees consents by majority vote, 1 the board of supervisors may provide for payment as requested 2 or modify the method of payment of costs and expenses. 3 4. If the board decides that dissolution is warranted for 4 the best interest of the public, it shall publish a notice in a 5 newspaper of general circulation published in the district or, 6 if no newspaper is published in the district, in a newspaper 7 published in the county in which the major part of the district 8 is located as provided in chapter 9J and give notice by mail 9 to all known claimants or creditors of the district that it 10 will receive and adjudicate claims against the district for 11 four months from the date the notice is published and shall 12 levy an annual tax as necessary against all property in the 13 district for the number of years required to pay all claims 14 allowed. However, the annual tax levied under this subsection 15 shall not exceed four dollars per thousand dollars of assessed 16 valuation of the taxable property within the district at the 17 time of dissolution. The levy shall be made in the same manner 18 as provided in section 76.2 . After the board makes a specific 19 finding that all indebtedness, costs, and expenses have been 20 paid or levies approved for their payment, the board shall 21 dissolve the district by resolution entered upon its records. 22 The dissolution order shall be noted by the auditor on the 23 county records, showing the date when the dissolution became 24 effective. 25 Sec. 80. Section 359.52, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 a. The board of trustees shall set forth its proposal in a 28 resolution and shall publish notice of the resolution and of 29 a date, time, and place of a public hearing on the proposal. 30 The notice shall be published in a newspaper published at least 31 once weekly and having general circulation in the township or 32 in the largest city in the township as provided in chapter 9J . 33 The notice shall be published no less than ten days and no more 34 than twenty days before the hearing. 35 -37- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 37/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 81. Section 362.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. A publication required by the city code must be in a 3 newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 4 circulation in the city. However, if the city has a population 5 of two hundred or less, or in the case of ordinances and 6 amendments to be published in a city in which no newspaper is 7 published, a publication may be made by posting in three public 8 places in the city which have been permanently designated by 9 ordinance published as provided in chapter 9J . 10 Sec. 82. Section 362.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 by striking the subsection. 12 Sec. 83. Section 364.2, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 c. Notice of the election shall be given by publication 15 as prescribed in section 49.53 in a newspaper of general 16 circulation in the city and chapter 9J . 17 Sec. 84. Section 364.4, subsection 4, paragraph e, 18 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 (a) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 21 into a lease or lease-purchase contract payable from the 22 general fund by causing a notice of the meeting to discuss 23 entering into the lease or lease-purchase contract, including 24 a statement of the principal amount and purpose of the lease 25 or lease-purchase contract and the right to petition for an 26 election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 27 general circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the city 28 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 29 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 30 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 31 action to enter into the lease or lease-purchase contract. 32 Sec. 85. Section 368.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 368.4 Annexing moratorium. 35 -38- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 38/ 58 S.F. _____ A city, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 1 agree with another city or cities to refrain from annexing 2 specifically described territory for a period not to exceed 3 ten years and, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 4 extend the agreement for subsequent periods not to exceed ten 5 years each. Notice of a hearing shall be served by regular 6 mail at least thirty days before the hearing on the city 7 development board and on the board of supervisors of the county 8 in which the territory is located and shall be published in 9 an official county newspaper as provided in chapter 9J in 10 each county containing a city conducting a hearing regarding 11 the agreement, in an official county newspaper in any county 12 within two miles of any such city, and in an official newspaper 13 of each city conducting a hearing regarding the agreement. 14 The notice shall include the time and place of the hearing, 15 describe the territory subject to the proposed agreement, 16 and the general terms of the agreement. After passage of a 17 resolution by the cities approving the agreements, a copy 18 of the agreement and a copy of any resolution extending an 19 agreement shall be filed with the city development board within 20 ten days of enactment. If such an agreement is in force, the 21 board shall dismiss a petition or plan which violates the terms 22 of the agreement. 23 Sec. 86. Section 368.7, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 24 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 d. The city shall provide for a public hearing on the 26 application before approving or denying it. The city shall 27 provide written notice at least fourteen business days prior 28 to any action by the city council regarding the application, 29 including a public hearing, by regular mail to the chairperson 30 of the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 31 portion of the territory proposed to be annexed, each public 32 utility which serves the territory proposed to be annexed, 33 each owner of property located within the territory to be 34 annexed who is not a party to the application, and each owner 35 -39- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 39/ 58 S.F. _____ of property that adjoins the territory to be annexed unless 1 the adjoining property is in a city. The city shall publish 2 notice of the application and public hearing on the application 3 in an official county newspaper in each county which contains 4 a portion of the territory proposed to be annexed as provided 5 in chapter 9J . Both the written and published notice shall 6 include the time and place of the public hearing and a legal 7 description of the territory to be annexed. The city shall 8 not assess the costs of providing notice as required in this 9 section to the applicants. The city council shall approve or 10 deny the application by resolution of the council. 11 Sec. 87. Section 368.7, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 12 amended to read as follows: 13 2. An application for annexation of territory not within 14 an urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 15 annexation is directed must be approved by resolution of the 16 council which receives the application. The city council shall 17 mail a copy of the application by certified mail to the board 18 of supervisors of each county which contains a portion of the 19 territory at least fourteen business days prior to any action 20 taken by the city council on the application. The council 21 shall also publish notice of the application in an official 22 county newspaper in each county which contains a portion of 23 the territory as provided in chapter 9J at least fourteen days 24 prior to any action taken by the council on the application. 25 Upon receiving approval of the council, the city clerk shall 26 file a copy of the resolution, map, and legal description of 27 the territory involved with the secretary of state, the county 28 board of supervisors of each county which contains a portion 29 of the territory, each affected public utility, and the state 30 department of transportation. The city clerk shall also record 31 a copy of the legal description, map, and resolution with the 32 county recorder of each county which contains a portion of 33 the territory. The secretary of state shall not accept and 34 acknowledge a copy of a legal description, map, and resolution 35 -40- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 40/ 58 S.F. _____ of annexation which would create an island. The annexation is 1 completed upon acknowledgment by the secretary of state that 2 the secretary of state has received the legal description, map, 3 and resolution. 4 3. An application for annexation of territory within an 5 urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 6 annexation is directed must be approved both by resolution of 7 the council which receives the application and by the board. 8 The board shall not approve an application which creates an 9 island. Notice of the application shall be mailed by certified 10 mail, by the city to which the annexation is directed, at least 11 fourteen business days prior to any action by the city council 12 on the application to the council of each city whose boundary 13 adjoins the territory or is within two miles of the territory, 14 to the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 15 portion of the territory, each affected public utility, and 16 to the regional planning authority of the territory. Notice 17 of the application shall be published in an official county 18 newspaper in each county which contains a portion of the 19 territory as provided in chapter 9J at least ten business days 20 prior to any action by the city council on the application. 21 The annexation is completed when the board has filed and 22 recorded copies of applicable portions of the proceedings as 23 required by section 368.20, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . 24 Sec. 88. Section 368.11, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 5. Before a petition for involuntary annexation may be 27 filed, the petitioner shall hold a public meeting on the 28 petition. Notice of the meeting shall be published in an 29 official county newspaper as provided in chapter 9J in each 30 county which contains a part of the territory at least five 31 days before the date of the public meeting. The mayor of 32 the city proposing to annex the territory, or that personâs 33 designee, shall serve as chairperson of the public meeting. 34 The city clerk of the same city or the city clerkâs designee 35 -41- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 41/ 58 S.F. _____ shall record the proceedings of the public meeting. Any 1 person attending the meeting may submit written comments and 2 may be heard on the petition. The minutes of the public 3 meeting and all documents submitted at the public meeting 4 shall be forwarded to the county board of supervisors of each 5 county where the territory is located and to the board by the 6 chairperson of the meeting. 7 Sec. 89. Section 373.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 1. Within sixty days after its organization, the commission 10 shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of 11 receiving information and material which will assist in the 12 drafting of a charter. Notice of the date, time, and place 13 of the hearing shall be published in the official county 14 newspapers of as provided in chapter 9J in each county in which 15 the participating cities are located. 16 Sec. 90. Section 384.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 3. Following, and not until, completion of requirements 19 of section 24.2A , the council shall set a time and place for 20 public hearing on the budget before the final certification 21 date and shall publish notice of the hearing pursuant to 22 section 362.3 in a newspaper published at least once weekly 23 and having general circulation in the city. However, if the 24 city has a population of two hundred or less, publication 25 may be made by posting in three public places in the city as 26 provided in chapter 9J . A summary of the proposed budget and 27 a description of the procedure for protesting the city budget 28 under section 384.19 , in the form prescribed by the director of 29 the department of management, shall be included in the notice. 30 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 must 31 be filed with the county auditor. The department of management 32 shall prescribe the form for the public hearing notice for use 33 by cities. 34 Sec. 91. Section 384.24A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 35 -42- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 42/ 58 S.F. _____ subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 (1) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 2 into a loan agreement payable from the general fund by causing 3 a notice of the meeting to discuss entering into the loan 4 agreement, including a statement of the principal amount and 5 purpose of the loan agreement and the right to petition for 6 an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 7 general circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the city 8 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 9 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 10 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 11 action to enter into the loan agreement. 12 Sec. 92. Section 384.25, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a council may institute 15 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential 16 corporate purpose specified in section 384.24, subsection 3 , 17 paragraph âwâ or âxâ , in an amount equal to or greater than 18 three million dollars by causing a notice of the proposal 19 to issue the bonds, including a statement of the amount 20 and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate of 21 interest which the bonds are to bear, and the right to petition 22 for an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper 23 of general circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the 24 city at least ten days prior to the meeting at which it is 25 proposed to take action for the issuance of the bonds. 26 Sec. 93. Section 384.26, subsection 5, paragraph a, 27 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 , a council 30 may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 31 for the issuance of bonds for a general corporate purpose by 32 causing a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including 33 a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together 34 with the maximum rate of interest which the bonds are to bear, 35 -43- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 43/ 58 S.F. _____ and the right to petition for an election, to be published at 1 least once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided 2 in chapter 9J within the city at least ten days prior to 3 the meeting at which it is proposed to take action for the 4 issuance of the bonds subject to the following population-based 5 limitations, adjusted and published annually in January by the 6 department of management by applying the percentage change in 7 the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the most 8 recent available twelve-month period published in the federal 9 register by the United States department of labor, bureau of 10 labor statistics: 11 Sec. 94. Section 384.84A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 1. The governing body of a city may institute proceedings 14 to issue revenue bonds for storm water drainage construction 15 projects under section 384.84, subsection 7 , by causing notice 16 of the proposed project, with a description of the proposed 17 project and a description of the formula for the determination 18 of the rate or rates applied to users for payment of the bonds, 19 and a description of the bonds and maximum rate of interest 20 and the right to petition for an election if the project meets 21 the requirement of subsection 2 , to be published at least once 22 in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 23 9J within the city at least thirty days before the meeting at 24 which the governing body proposes to take action to institute 25 proceedings for issuance of revenue bonds for the storm water 26 drainage construction project. 27 Sec. 95. Section 403.15, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 5. The mayor or chairperson of the board, as applicable, 30 shall designate a chairperson and vice chairperson from among 31 the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, 32 technical experts and such other agents and employees, 33 permanent and temporary, as it may require, and the agency may 34 determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For 35 -44- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 44/ 58 S.F. _____ such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or 1 retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized 2 to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter 3 shall file, with the local governing body, on or before 4 September 30 of each year, a report of its activities for the 5 preceding fiscal year, which report shall include a complete 6 financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, 7 income and operating expense as of the end of such fiscal year. 8 At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a 9 newspaper of general circulation , as provided in chapter 9J, in 10 the city or county, as applicable, a notice to the effect that 11 such report has been filed with the municipality, and that the 12 report is available for inspection during business hours in the 13 office of the city clerk or county auditor, as applicable, and 14 in the office of the agency. 15 Sec. 96. Section 403A.5, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 b. The mayor shall designate a chairperson and vice 18 chairperson from among the commissioners. An agency may employ 19 an executive director, technical experts and such other agents 20 and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, 21 and the agency may determine their qualifications, duties, 22 and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, 23 an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal 24 staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise 25 powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing 26 body, on or before September 30 of each year, a report of 27 its activities for the preceding fiscal year, which report 28 shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its 29 assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the 30 end of such fiscal year. At the time of filing the report, 31 the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation 32 a notice in the community a notice as provided in chapter 33 9J to the effect that such report has been filed with the 34 municipality, and that the report is available for inspection 35 -45- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 45/ 58 S.F. _____ during business hours in the office of the city clerk and in 1 the office of the agency. 2 Sec. 97. Section 403A.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 403A.28 Public hearing required. 5 The municipal housing agency shall not undertake any 6 low-cost housing project until such time as a public hearing 7 has been called, at which time the agency shall advise the 8 public of the name of the proposed project, its location, the 9 number of living units proposed and their approximate cost. 10 Notice of the public hearing on the proposed project shall be 11 published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation 12 as provided in chapter 9J within the municipality, at least 13 fifteen days prior to the date set for the hearing. 14 Sec. 98. Section 419.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 419.9 Public hearing. 17 Prior to the issuance of any bonds under authority of this 18 chapter , the municipality shall conduct a public hearing on the 19 proposal to issue said bonds. Notice of intention to issue the 20 bonds, specifying the amount and purpose thereof and the time 21 and place of hearing, shall be published at least once not less 22 than fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the hearing in 23 a newspaper published and having a general circulation within 24 the municipality. If there is no newspaper published therein, 25 the notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the 26 county and having a general circulation in the municipality 27 as provided in chapter 9J . At the time and place fixed for 28 the public hearing the governing body of the municipality 29 shall give all local residents who appear at the hearing an 30 opportunity to express their views for or against the proposal 31 to issue the bonds and at the hearing, or any adjournment 32 thereof, shall adopt a resolution determining whether or not to 33 proceed with the issuance of the bonds. 34 Sec. 99. Section 422D.1, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 35 -46- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 46/ 58 S.F. _____ 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. To be effective, the resolution declaring emergency 2 medical services to be an essential service shall be considered 3 and voted on for approval at two meetings of the board prior to 4 the meeting at which the resolution is to be finally approved 5 by a majority of the board by recorded vote, as defined in 6 section 331.101 . Notice of the first meeting of the board 7 at which the resolution is considered and voted on shall be 8 published not less than sixty days prior to the date of the 9 meeting in one or more newspapers that meet the requirements 10 of section 618.14 as provided in chapter 9J . The board shall 11 not suspend or waive the requirements for approval of the 12 resolution or approval of the imposition of a tax under this 13 chapter . 14 Sec. 100. Section 423A.7, subsection 4, paragraph f, 15 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 (1) A city or county acting on behalf of an unincorporated 17 area may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 18 for the issuance of bonds under this section by causing 19 a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including a 20 statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together 21 with the maximum rate of interest which the bonds are to bear, 22 and the right to petition for an election, to be published at 23 least once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided 24 in chapter 9J within the city or unincorporated area at least 25 ten days prior to the meeting at which it is proposed to take 26 action for the issuance of the bonds. 27 Sec. 101. Section 423B.9, subsection 4, paragraph a, 28 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 (1) A bond issuer may institute proceedings for the issuance 30 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 31 bonds, including a statement of the amount and purpose of the 32 bonds, together with the maximum rate of interest which the 33 bonds are to bear, and the right to petition for an election, 34 to be published at least once in a newspaper of general 35 -47- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 47/ 58 S.F. _____ circulation as provided in chapter 9J within the political 1 subdivision or unincorporated area at least ten days prior to 2 the meeting at which it is proposed to take action for the 3 issuance of the bonds. 4 Sec. 102. Section 423F.3, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 d. The board secretary shall notify the county commissioner 7 of elections of the intent to take an issue to the voters 8 pursuant to paragraph âbâ or âcâ . The county commissioner 9 of elections shall publish the notices required by law for 10 special or general elections as provided in chapter 9J , and the 11 election shall be held on a date specified in section 39.2, 12 subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . A majority of those voting on the 13 question must favor approval of the revenue purpose statement. 14 If the proposal is not approved, the school district shall 15 not submit the same or new revenue purpose statement to the 16 electors for a period of six months from the date of the 17 previous election. 18 Sec. 103. Section 423F.3, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. Prior to approving the use of revenues received under 21 this chapter for an athletic facility infrastructure project 22 within the scope of the school districtâs approved revenue 23 purpose statement or pursuant to subsection 4 for a school 24 district without an approved revenue statement, the board of 25 directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposal 26 for the athletic facility infrastructure project and hold an 27 additional public hearing on the issue of construction of the 28 athletic facility. Notice of the time and place of the public 29 hearing shall be published not less than ten nor more than 30 twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper which is 31 a newspaper of general circulation in the school district as 32 provided in chapter 9J . If at any time prior to the fifteenth 33 day following the hearing, the secretary of the board of 34 directors receives a petition containing the required number 35 -48- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 48/ 58 S.F. _____ of signatures and asking that the question of the approval of 1 the use of revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 2 project be submitted to the voters of the school district, 3 the board of directors shall either rescind the boardâs 4 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 5 infrastructure project or direct the county commissioner of 6 elections to submit the question to the registered voters of 7 the school district at an election held on a date specified 8 in section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . The petition 9 must be signed by eligible electors equal in number to not less 10 than one hundred or thirty percent of the number of voters 11 at the last preceding election of school officials under 12 section 277.1 , whichever is greater. If a majority of those 13 voting on the question favors the use of the revenues for the 14 athletic facility infrastructure project, the board shall be 15 authorized to approve such use by resolution of the board. If 16 a majority of those voting on the question does not favor the 17 use of the revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 18 project, the board of directors shall rescind the boardâs 19 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 20 infrastructure project. If a petition is not received by the 21 board of directors within the prescribed time period, the board 22 of directors may approve the use of revenues for the athletic 23 facility infrastructure project without voter approval. 24 Sec. 104. Section 441.49, subsection 2, paragraph a, 25 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 On or before October 8 the county auditor shall cause to 28 be published in official newspapers of general circulation 29 as provided in chapter 9J the final equalization order. The 30 county auditor shall also notify each property owner or 31 taxpayer whose valuation has been increased by the final 32 equalization order by mail postmarked on or before October 33 8. The publication and the individual notice mailed to each 34 property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has been increased 35 -49- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 49/ 58 S.F. _____ shall include, in type larger than the remainder of the 1 publication or notice, the following statements: 2 Assessed values are equalized by the department of revenue 3 every two years. Local taxing authorities determine the final 4 tax levies and may reduce property tax rates to compensate 5 for any increase in valuation due to equalization. If you 6 are not satisfied that your assessment as adjusted by the 7 equalization order is correct, you may file a protest against 8 such assessment with the board of review on or after October 9 9, to and including October 31. 10 Sec. 105. Section 446.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 2. Publication of the date, time, and place of the annual 13 tax sale shall be made once by the treasurer in at least one 14 official newspaper in the county as selected by the board of 15 supervisors and designated by the treasurer as provided in 16 chapter 9J at least one week, but not more than three weeks, 17 before the day of sale. The publication shall contain a 18 description of the parcel to be sold that is clear, concise, 19 and sufficient to distinguish the parcel to be sold from 20 all other parcels. All items offered for sale pursuant to 21 section 446.18 may be indicated by an âsâ or by an asterisk. 22 The publication shall also contain the name of the person 23 in whose name the parcel to be sold is taxed and the amount 24 delinquent for which the parcel is liable each year, the 25 amount of the interest and fees, and the amount of the service 26 fee as provided in section 446.10, subsection 2 , all to be 27 incorporated as a single sum. The publication shall contain a 28 statement that, after the sale, if the parcel is not redeemed 29 within the period provided in chapter 447 , the right to redeem 30 expires and a deed may be issued. 31 Sec. 106. Section 447.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 447.10 Service by publication ââ fees. 34 If notice in accordance with section 447.9 cannot be served 35 -50- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 50/ 58 S.F. _____ upon a person entitled to notice in the manner prescribed in 1 that section, then the holder of the certificate of purchase 2 shall cause the required notice to be published once in an 3 official newspaper as provided in chapter 9J in the county. 4 If service is made by publication, the affidavit required by 5 section 447.12 shall state the reason why service in accordance 6 with section 447.9 could not be made. Service of notice 7 by publication shall be deemed complete on the day of the 8 publication. Fees for publication, if required under section 9 447.13 , shall not exceed the customary publication fees for 10 official county publications. 11 Sec. 107. Section 455B.305A, subsection 1, paragraph b, 12 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 b. Prior to the siting of a proposed new sanitary landfill 14 or incinerator by a private agency disposing of waste which 15 the agency generates on property owned by the agency which is 16 located outside of the city limits and for which no county 17 zoning ordinance exists, the private agency shall cause written 18 notice of the proposal, including the nature of the proposed 19 facility, and the right of the owner to submit a petition for 20 formal siting of the proposed site, to be served either in 21 person or by mail on the owners and residents of all property 22 within two miles in each direction of the proposed local site 23 area. The owners shall be identified based upon the authentic 24 tax records of the county in which the proposed site is to be 25 located. The private agency shall notify the county board of 26 supervisors which governs the county in which the site is to 27 be located of the proposed siting, and certify that notices 28 have been mailed to owners and residents of the impacted area. 29 Written notice shall be published in the official newspaper, 30 as selected by the county board of supervisors pursuant to 31 section 349.1 , of the county in which the site is located as 32 provided in chapter 9J . The notice shall state the name and 33 address of the applicant, the location of the proposed site, 34 the nature and size of the development, the nature of the 35 -51- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 51/ 58 S.F. _____ activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed activity, 1 and a description of the right of persons to comment on the 2 request. If two hundred fifty or a minimum of twenty percent, 3 whichever is less, of the owners and residents of property 4 notified submit a petition for formal review to the county 5 board of supervisors or if the county board of supervisors, on 6 the boardâs own motion, requires formal review of the proposed 7 siting, the private agency proposal is subject to the formal 8 siting procedures established pursuant to this section . 9 Sec. 108. Section 455B.305A, subsection 3, paragraph b, 10 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 b. Written notice shall be published in the official 12 newspaper of the county in which the site is located as 13 provided in chapter 9J . The notice shall state the name and 14 address of the applicant, the location of the proposed site, 15 the nature and size of the development, the nature of the 16 activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed activity, 17 the date when the request for site approval will be submitted, 18 and a description of the right of persons to comment on the 19 request. 20 Sec. 109. Section 455B.305A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 5. At least one public hearing shall be held by the city 23 council or county board of supervisors no sooner than ninety 24 days but no later than one hundred twenty days from receipt of 25 the request for siting approval. A hearing shall be preceded 26 by published notice in an official newspaper of the county of 27 the proposed site, including in any official newspaper located 28 in the city of the proposed site as provided in chapter 9J . 29 Sec. 110. Section 459.304, subsection 2, paragraph a, 30 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 (1) The board shall publish a notice that the board has 32 received the application in a newspaper having a general 33 circulation in the county as provided in chapter 9J . 34 Sec. 111. Section 465C.11, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 35 -52- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 52/ 58 S.F. _____ amended to read as follows: 1 3. Before the department shall make a finding of imperative 2 and unavoidable public necessity, or shall enter into any 3 amendment to articles of dedication, the department shall 4 provide notice of such proposal and opportunity for any person 5 to be heard. Such notice shall be published at least once in a 6 newspaper with a general circulation in the county or counties 7 wherein the area directly affected is situated as provided 8 in chapter 9J , and mailed within ten days of such published 9 notice to all persons who have requested notice of all such 10 proposed actions. Each notice shall set forth the substance 11 of the proposed action and describe, with or without legal 12 description, the area affected, and shall set forth a place and 13 time not less than sixty days thence for all persons desiring 14 to be heard to have reasonable opportunity to be heard prior to 15 the finding of the department. 16 Sec. 112. Section 468.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 468.34 Advertisement for bids. 19 The board shall publish notice once each week for two 20 consecutive weeks in a newspaper published as provided in 21 chapter 9J in the county where the improvement is located, and 22 publish additional advertisement and publication elsewhere as 23 the board may direct. The notice shall state the time and 24 place of letting the work of construction of the improvement, 25 specifying the approximate amount of work to be done in each 26 numbered section of the district, the time fixed for the 27 commencement, and the time of the completion of the work, that 28 bids will be received on the entire work and in sections or 29 divisions of it, and that a bidder will be required to deposit 30 a bid security with the county auditor as provided in section 31 468.35 . All notices shall set the date that bids will be 32 received and upon which the work will be let. However, when 33 the estimated cost of the improvement is less than the adjusted 34 competitive bid threshold, the board may let the contract for 35 -53- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 53/ 58 S.F. _____ the construction without taking bids and without publishing 1 notice. 2 Sec. 113. Section 468.82, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 468.82 Payment. 5 The board, at the time of making the levy, shall fix a time 6 within which all assessments in excess of one hundred dollars 7 may be paid, and before any bonds are issued, publish notice 8 in an official newspaper as provided in chapter 9J in the 9 county where the district is located, of such time. After the 10 expiration of such time, no assessments may be paid except 11 in the manner and at the times fixed by the board in the 12 resolution authorizing the issue of the bonds. 13 Sec. 114. Section 468.257, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 3. Except as otherwise required by section 468.16 , the 16 notice required by this section shall be served by publication 17 once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 18 chapter 9J in each county in which the overlying districtâs 19 land is situated. The publication shall be made not less than 20 twenty days prior to the day set for the hearing. Proof of 21 service shall be made by affidavit of the publisher. 22 Sec. 115. Section 468.507, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 468.507 Notice of election. 25 The board, or, if in more than one county, the boards acting 26 jointly, shall cause notice of said election to be given, 27 setting forth the time and place of holding the same and the 28 hours when the polls will open and close. Such notice shall 29 be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper in which 30 the official proceedings of the board are published as provided 31 in chapter 9J in the county, or if the district extends into 32 more than one county, then in such newspaper of as provided in 33 chapter 9J in each county. The last of such publications shall 34 not be less than ten days before the date of said election. 35 -54- LSB 6922XC (3) 91 ss/jh 54/ 58 S.F. _____ Sec. 116. Section 533.320, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The sale shall be held at the time and place specified 3 in a notice published prior to the sale once each week for 4 two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation 5 published in the city or unincorporated area in which the state 6 credit union has its principal place of business, or if there 7 is none, a newspaper of general circulation published in the 8 county, or in a county adjoining the county, in which the state 9 credit union has its principal place of business as provided 10 in chapter 9J . 11 Sec. 117. Section 556.12, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 12 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 13 a. Provide for the publication annually of at least one 14 notice not later than the following November 30. Each notice 15 may be published at least once each week for two successive 16 weeks in an English language newspaper of general circulation 17 in the county in this state in which is located the last known 18 address of any person to be named in the notice. If an address 19 is not listed or if the address is outside this state, the 20 notice may be published in the county in which the holder of 21 the abandoned property has its principal place of business 22 within this state as provided in chapter 9J . 23 b. Publish information to make the public aware of 24 the existence of unclaimed property and the treasurer of 25 stateâs unclaimed property program in a newspaper in general 26 circulation in the state as provided in chapter 9J . 27 Sec. 118. REPEAL. Section 618.19, Code 2026, is repealed. 28 DIVISION III 29 EFFECTIVE DATE 30 Sec. 119. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 31 2026, except that the secretary of state may adopt rules for 32 the implementation of this Act prior to that date. 33